Hawaii statutes.
[§711-1112] Interference with the operator
of a public transit vehicle. (1) A person commits the offense of
interference with the operator of a public transit vehicle if the person
interferes with the operation of a public transit vehicle or lessens the
ability of the operator to operate the public transit vehicle by:

(a) Intentionally, knowingly, or recklessly causing
bodily injury to the operator of the public transit vehicle; or

(b) Threatening, by word or conduct, to cause bodily
injury to the operator of the public transit vehicle with the intent to
terrorize, or in reckless disregard of the risk of terrorizing the operator of
the public transit vehicle.

(2) For the purposes of this section,
"public transit vehicle" is a public paratransit vehicle providing
service to the disabled, any transit vehicle used for the transportation of
passengers in return for legally charged fees or fares, any school bus, or any
taxi.

(3) Interference with the operator of a public
transit vehicle is a class C felony. [L 1996, c 87, §3]

Cross References

Unauthorized entry into motor vehicle, see §§708-836.5 and
708-836.6.

COMMENTARY ON §711-1112

Act 87, Session Laws 1996, added the new offense of
interference with the operator of a public transit vehicle due to the increased
danger to the public involved when the operators are terrorized or assaulted.
Conference Committee Report No. 30.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next